exercise3/my_lexicon.lexc
LEXICON Root
        Nouns ; 

LEXICON Nouns
kissa   Next ;
koira   Next ;
melu    Next ;
metsä   Next ;
peli    Next ;
päivä   Next ;
pää     Next ;
sähkö   Next ;
talo    Next ;
tie     Next ;
tuoli   Next ;
työ     Next ;
väri    Next ;
yö      Next ;

LEXICON Next
        Nouns ;
        # ;
        
END
